Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2070.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; COMUNIDADES LATINAS UNIDAS EN SERVICIO (CLUES).new text end new text begin $750,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $750,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to Comunidades Latinas Unidas En Servicio (CLUES) to expand art-making and programming to celebrate Latino cultural heritage and support local artists with tools, professional development, networking, and gallery and presentation opportunities. new text end